Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB232.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Sustainable Community Safe House Grant Program Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Commission." The Pennsylvania Public Utility Commission."Department." The Department of Community and Economic Development of the Commonwealth."Eligible political subdivision." A county, city, borough, incorporated town or township and any council of governments established among any of them."Fund." The State Sustainable Energy Fund established under 123456789101112131415161718 section 4(a)."Program." The Sustainable Community Safe House Grant Program established under section 3(a).Section 3. Sustainable Community Safe House Grant Program.(a) Establishment.--The Sustainable Community Safe House Grant Program is established within the commission for the purpose of providing grants under this act.(b) Grants.--The commission shall award grants to eligible political subdivisions for the purpose of creating and maintaining renewable energy backup systems for the community. A grant awarded under this act may not exceed $250,000.Section 4. State Sustainable Energy Fund.(a) Establishment.--The State Sustainable Energy Fund is established as a separate fund within the State Treasury. Money in the fund shall be used for the purpose of this act.(b) Continuing appropriation.--Money in the fund is appropriated to the commission on a continuing basis to award grants under this act.(c) Transfer.--The sum of $100,000,000 shall be transferred from the General Fund to the fund.Section 5. Administration.(a) Guidelines.--The department shall promulgate guidelines for the implementation and administration of this act.(b) Application.--An application for a grant under this act shall be submitted by an eligible political subdivision in the form and manner as prescribed by the commission, which shall contain, at a minimum, the following information:(1) The name and contact information of the applicant.(2) The address of the proposed sustainable community safe house, and its current use, if applicable.20250HB0232PN0185 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) The amount of grant money requested.(4) The proposed use for the grant money requested.(5) A description of the proposed sustainable energy generation and storage plan.(6) A description of how this supports the community.(7) Any other information that the commission deems necessary and appropriate.(c) Public notice.--The commission shall provide information regarding the availability and award of grant money on the commission's publicly accessible Internet website.Section 6. Awarding of grants.(a) Determination.--Within 20 days of the submission of an application for a grant under section 5(b), the commission shall determine:(1) Whether to disapprove, in total or in part, or approve the application.(2) If approved, the amount of the grant award.(b) Considerations.--In awarding grant money to an eligible political subdivision, the commission shall consider the following:(1) Geographic and demographic diversity of the political subdivision applying for the grant money.(2) How the community and other individuals within the eligible political subdivision would be served through the awarding of the grant to the eligible political subdivision.(c) Notice.--(1) The commission shall provide written notice to the eligible political subdivision of the approval or disapproval of an application submitted under section 5(b).(2) If the application is approved, the notice of the 20250HB0232PN0185 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 award of grant money shall include the amount of the grant money awarded and any conditions or restrictions on the use of the grant money.(3) If the application is disapproved, the notice of the disapproval of all or part of the application shall include the reasons for the full or partial disapproval.(4) The commission shall provide copies of all notices to the department when they are provided to the department and shall provide other documents, information and data to the department immediately upon request.Section 7. Report.(a) Preparation.--By September 30, 2026, the department shall prepare a report that lists each eligible political subdivision that received a grant under this act and a summary of the information required under section 5(b).(b) Publication.--The report under subsection (a) shall be posted on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.Section 8. Expiration.This act shall expire December 31, 2026.Section 9. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0232PN0185 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021